Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1418.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Hunting and Trapping Education.--(a) No later than July 1, 2027, the commission , in consultation with the department , shall develop and make available to each school entity a model program of age-appropriate hunting and trapping education, including firearm safety instruction, for students in grades six through twelve.(b) The firearm safety instruction under the model program must:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) Comply with the firearm safety training requirements of the commission's basic hunter-trapper education course.(2) Be taught by an individual who is a commission-certified hunter education instructor.(3) Include the following topics:(i) Proper usage and handling of firearms.(ii) Safe cleaning and maintenance of firearms.(iii) Different types of firearms.(iv) Safe hunting practices and techniques.(v) History of wildlife conservation and hunting.(c) Firearms or ammunition may not be brought into a school building as part of the firearm safety instruction under the model program.(d) A school entity may provide the firearm safety instruction under the model program as:(1) an optional extracurricular class for students in grades six through twelve in the school entity; or(2) part of an existing course for the purpose of teaching self-expression and enjoyment of recreational activity.(e) Upon request by a parent or legal guardian of a student, the student shall be excused, without penalty or loss of academic credit, from attending the firearm safety instruction under the model program.(f) A student who completes the firearm safety instruction under the model program is deemed to have completed the commission's basic hunter-trapper education course that is required to obtain a hunting license under State law.(g) The commission , in consultation with the department , shall prescribe procedures necessary to implement and administer the model program.20260SB1418PN1882 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Any training hours offered by the commission for school entities that result in a school staff member becoming a certified hunter education instructor or for the purposes of administering any other program offered by the commission shall count towards continuing professional education under sections 1205.1, 1205.2 and 1205.3.(i) Any costs incurred by a school entity as a result of this section may be reimbursed by the commission. (j) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Game Commission."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Firearm." As defined in 34 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Hunting." As defined in 34 Pa.C.S. § 102."Model program." The model program developed under subsection (a)."School entity." A school district, joint school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit, area career and technical school or parochial school."Trapping." As defined in 34 Pa.C.S. § 102.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1418PN1882 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425